Alabama, session 2026rs, SB138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1)FRANCHISE AGREEMENT. A written agreement or an
amendment or renewal of a written agreement, or in the absence
of a written agreement, a course of practice, in which a
person grants to another person a license to use a trade name,
trademark, service mark, or related characteristic in exchange
for the payment of a franchise fee. The term includes a sales
and service agreement other than a sales and service agreement
regulated by Chapter 20 of Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975, The
Motor Vehicle Franchise Act; Chapter 8A of Tile 28, Code of
Alabama 1975; or Chapter 9 of Title 28, Code of Alabama 1975.
(2) FRANCHISEE. a. A person with which a franchisor has
agreed or permitted, in writing or in practice, to purchase,
sell, or offer for sale a product manufactured, produced,
represented, or distributed by the franchisor in exchange for
the payment of a franchise fee from the franchisee to the
franchisor.
b. The term does not include a person regulated under
Page 1

b. The term does not include a person regulated under
SB138 Enrolled
Chapter 20 of Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975, The Motor Vehicle
Franchise Act; Chapter 8A of Title 28, Code of Alabama 1975;
Chapter 9 of Title 28, Code of Alabama 1975; or Chapter 15 of
Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) FRANCHISOR. a. A person that has agreed with or
permits, in writing or in practice, a franchisee to purchase,
sell, or offer for sale a product manufactured, produced,
assembled, represented, or distributed by the franchisor. The
term includes: (i) the manufacturer, producer, assembler, or
distributor of the product; (ii) an intermediate distributor;
and (iii) an agent, officer, or field or area representative
of the franchisor.
b. The term does not include a person regulated under
Chapter 20 of Title 8, Code of Alabama 1975, The Motor Vehicle
Franchise Act; Chapter 8A of Title 28, Code of Alabama 1975;
Chapter 9 of Title 28, Code of Alabama 1975; or Chapter 15 of
Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975.
(4) ORIGINAL FRANCHISE AGREEMENT. A franchise agreement
that is not a renewal or an amendment. The term includes any
written documents incorporated into the agreement by
reference.
(5) RELIGIOUS DAY OPERATION REQUIREMENT. Any
requirement that has the effect of requiring a franchisee to
operate a franchise on a day when doing so would conflict with
the franchisee's sincerely held religious beliefs.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), when a
franchisee asserts a sincerely held religious belief, a
franchisor may not:
Page 2

franchisor may not:
SB138 Enrolled
(1) Enforce a religious day operation requirement;
(2) Require a franchisee to accept a religious day
operation requirement as part of an amendment to the franchise
agreement; or
(3) Refuse to renew a franchise agreement based on a
franchisee's decision to not comply with a religious day
operation requirement.
(c) Subsection (b) does not apply and a franchisor is
not prohibited from enforcing a religious day operation
requirement when:
(1) The original franchise agreement or franchise
agreement then in effect conspicuously provides for operation
on a day that imposes a religious day operation requirement;
(2) The franchisee agrees through a renewal or an
amendment to the franchise agreement to a religious day
operation requirement; or
(3) The franchisor and the franchisee enter a franchise
agreement expanding the franchisee's number of franchise
locations which contains a religious day operation
requirement.
(d) If a court finds reasonable cause to believe that a
franchisor violated subsection (b), the court may order:
(1) Actual damages, reasonable attorney fees, and costs
to the franchisee;
(2) A permanent or temporary injunction, a temporary
restraining order, or other appropriate order; and
(3) Civil penalties against the franchisor in an amount
not exceeding:
Page 3

not exceeding:
SB138 Enrolled
a. Ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a first
violation;
b. Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for an
additional violation within the five-year period ending on the
day on which the franchisee filed the complaint; or
c. Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for an additional
violation within the seven-year period ending on the day on
which the franchisee filed the complaint.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 4

2026.
SB138 Enrolled





100
101 ________________________________________________
102 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
103
104
105
106 ________________________________________________
107 Speaker of the House of Representatives
108
109
110 SB138
111 Senate 12-Feb-26
112 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
113 the Senate.
114
115 Patrick Harris,
116 Secretary.
117
118
119
120
121 House of Representatives
122 Amended and passed: 08-Apr-26
123
124
125
126
127 Senate concurred in House amendment 08-Apr-26
128
129
130
131
132 By: Senator Roberts
Page 5